test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-pitkit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pitkit: # Noun 129 'eng /est pikkus/fin' - full paradigm
     pitkit+N+Sg+Nom: pitkit
     pitkit+N+Sg+Gen: pitkit
     pitkit+N+Sg+Par: pitkitõ
     pitkit+N+Sg+Dat: pitkitõn
     pitkit+N+Sg+Ins: pitkitõks
     pitkit+N+Sg+Ill: pitkitõ
     pitkit+N+Sg+Ela: pitkitst
     pitkit+N+Pl+Nom: pitkitõd
     pitkit+N+Pl+Gen: pitkitõd
     pitkit+N+Pl+Par: pitkitidi
     pitkit+N+Pl+Dat: pitkitõdõn
     pitkit+N+Pl+Ins: pitkitõdõks
     pitkit+N+Pl+Ill: pitkitiž
     pitkit+N+Pl+Ela: pitkitist
